Utah statutes.
58-1-309.   Laws and rules examination.

In addition to qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure enumerated in specific practice acts under this title, the division may by rule require an applicant to pass an examination of the laws and rules relevant to the occupation or profession to ensure familiarity with these laws and rules.



Enacted by Chapter 297, 1993 General Session

